District of Columbia statutes.
7-1304.08

Hearings closed to public; request for open hearing.

Hearings shall be closed to the public unless the person with an intellectual disability, or his or her counsel, requests that a hearing be open to the public.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 408, 25 DCR 5094
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 26(l), 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(y), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 6-1948.
1973 Ed., § 6-1675.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “the person with mental retardation” for “the mentally retarded person”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “an intellectual disability” for “mental retardation.”
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.